Utah statutes.
54-14-204.   Requirements or conditions on facility considered waived if
local government does not pay for actual excess cost 30 days before
construction.
Any requirement or condition in any permit, authorization, approval,
exception, or waiver of a local government for a facility that imposes an
actual excess cost shall be considered waived if the local government does not
pay the public utility for the actual excess cost, except any actual excess
costs specified in Subsection 54-14-201(2)(a) or (2)(b), within 30 days before
the date construction of the facility should commence in order to avoid a
significant risk of impairment of safe, reliable, and adequate service to
customers of the public utility.
